Illinois, session 104th, HB1899.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   HB1899- 2 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   HB1899- 3 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   HB1899- 4 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   HB1899- 5 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   HB1899- 6 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   HB1899- 7 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   HB1899- 8 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB1899- 9 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   HB1899- 10 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   HB1899- 11 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   HB1899- 12 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   HB1899- 13 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   HB1899- 14 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   HB1899- 15 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   HB1899- 16 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 9        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 10        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 11        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 12        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 13        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 14        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 16        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250;19            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 22        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 23        total as distributions under the provisions of any 24        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 25        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 26        retired partners, which payments are excluded in   HB1899- 17 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 2        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 3        adopted pursuant thereto;4            (G) The valuation limitation amount;5            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 10        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 11        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 12        computation of taxable income;13            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 18        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   HB1899- 18 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (K);4            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 5        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 6        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 7        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code;9            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 19        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 20        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 24        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 25        250;26            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in   HB1899- 19 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 2        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 3        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 4        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 5        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 6        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 7        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 8        net of bond premium amortization;9            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 10        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 11        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;12            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 13        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 14        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 15        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 17        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 18        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 19        held under claim of right for the taxable year;20            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 21        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 22        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 23        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 24        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 25        illness;26            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or   HB1899- 20 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;2            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 3        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 4        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 5        medical care savings account established under the 6        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 7        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 8        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 9        as provided in that Act;10            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 11        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 12        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 13        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 14        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 15        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 16        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);17            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 18        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 19        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 20        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 21        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 22        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;23            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 24        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 25        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 26        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed   HB1899- 21 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 2        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 3        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 4        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 5        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 6        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 7        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 8        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 9        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 10        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 11        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 12        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 13        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 14        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 15        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 16        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 17        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 18        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 19        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 20        times a number that represents the fractional 21        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 22        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 23        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;24            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 25        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 26        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year   HB1899- 22 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 2        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 5        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 6        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 7        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 8        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 9        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 10        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 11        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 12        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 13        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 14        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 15        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 16        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 17        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 18        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 19        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 20        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 21        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 22        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 23        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 24        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 25        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 26        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this   HB1899- 23 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 2        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 3        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 4        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 5        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 6        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 7        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 8        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 9        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 10        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;11            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 12        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 13        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 14        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 15        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 16        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 18        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 19        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 20        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 21        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 22        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 23        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 24        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 26        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes   HB1899- 24 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 2        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 3        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 4        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250;6            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 7        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 8        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 9        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 10        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 11        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:12                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 13            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 14            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 15            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 16            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 17            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 18            including the bonus depreciation deduction;19                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 20            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 21            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 22            0.429); and23                (3) for taxable years ending after December 24            31, 2005:25                    (i) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted   HB1899- 25 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 2                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 3                by 0.429);4                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 7                1.0;8                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 11                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 12                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 13                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 14                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 15                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 16                depreciation on that property; and17                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 18                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 19                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 20                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 21                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 22                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 23                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 24                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 25                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 26                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)).   HB1899- 26 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            The aggregate amount deducted under this 2        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 3        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 4        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 5        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 6        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 7        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250;9            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 10        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 11        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 12        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 13        an amount equal to that addition modification. 14            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 15        the last day of the last tax year for which a 16        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 17        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 18        required in any taxable year to make an addition 19        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 20        equal to that addition modification. 21            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 22        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 23        one piece of property.24            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 25        provisions of Section 250;26            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income,   HB1899- 27 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        other than salary, received by a driver in a 2        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;3            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   HB1899- 28 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 13        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250; 15            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 16        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 17        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB1899- 29 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 7        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 8        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 9        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;10            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 11        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 12        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 13        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 14        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; 16            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   HB1899- 30 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 4        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 8        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 9        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 10        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 11        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 12        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 13        be considered moneys contributed under this 14        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 15        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 16        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 17        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 18            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 19        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 20        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 21        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 23        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 24        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 25        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 26        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code;   HB1899- 31 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 3        operating in this State and licensed under the 4        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 5        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 6        organization operating in this State and licensed 7        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 8        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 9        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 10        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 11        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 12        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 13        of Section 250; and 14            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 15        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 16        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 17        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 18        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 19        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 20        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 21        another state; and 22            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 23        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 24        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 25        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 26        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal   HB1899- 32 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 2        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 3        during the taxable year from a qualified community 4        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 5        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 6        Act. 7            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 8        provisions of Section 250; . 9            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 11        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 12        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 13        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 14        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 15        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 16        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 17        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 18        the provisions of Section 250; and . 19            (NN) For taxable years beginning on or after 20        January 1, 2026, an amount equal to the amount of 21        overtime compensation that is paid to the taxpayer 22        during the taxable year and that is included in the 23        taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income; as used in 24        this subparagraph (NN), "overtime compensation" has 25        the meaning given to that term in the federal Fair 26        Labor Standards Act; this subparagraph (NN) is exempt   HB1899- 33 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        from the provisions of Section 250.  2    (b) Corporations.3        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base 4    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 5    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).6        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 7    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 8    of the following amounts:9            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 10        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 11        received from regulated investment companies during 12        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 13        income in the computation of taxable income;14            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 15        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 16        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 17        year;18            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 19        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 20        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 21        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 22        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 23        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 24        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 25        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act   HB1899- 34 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 2        law and is not a new enactment);3            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 4        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 5        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 6        ending prior to December 31, 1986;7            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 8        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 9        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 10        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 11        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 12        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 13        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 14        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 15        year, with the following limitations applied in the 16        order that they are listed:17                (i) the addition modification relating to the 18            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 19            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 20            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 21            of addition modification under this subparagraph 22            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 23            which was taken into account in calculating the 24            base income of an earlier taxable year, and25                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 26            net operating loss carried back or forward to the   HB1899- 35 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 2            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 3            such carryback or carryforward;4            For taxable years in which there is a net 5        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 6        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 7        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 8        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 9        computed independently under the preceding provisions 10        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;11            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 12        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 13        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 14        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 15        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;16            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 17        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 18        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 19        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 20        the Internal Revenue Code;21            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 22        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 23        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 24        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 25        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 26        deductions taken in all taxable years under   HB1899- 36 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.2            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 3        the last day of the last tax year for which a 4        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 5        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 6        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 7        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 8        equal to that subtraction modification. 9            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 10        modification under this subparagraph only once with 11        respect to any one piece of property;12            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 13        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 14        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 15        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 16        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 17        member of the same unitary business group but for the 18        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 19        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 20        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 21        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 22        who would be a member of the same unitary business 23        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 24        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 25        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 26        required to apportion business income under different   HB1899- 37 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 2        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 3        extent that dividends were included in base income of 4        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 5        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 6        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 7        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 8        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 9        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 10        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 11        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 12        accrued, or incurred. 13            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 14                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 15            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 16            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 17            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 18            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 19            with respect to such interest; or20                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 21            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 22            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 23            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 24            following:25                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 26                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest   HB1899- 38 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1                to a person that is not a related member, and2                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 3                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 4                person did not have as a principal purpose the 5                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 6                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 7                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 8                terms; or 9                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 10            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 11            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 12            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 13            and terms and the principal purpose for the 14            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 15            or 16                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 17            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 20            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 21            to the application or use of an alternative method 22            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 23                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 24            Director from making any other adjustment 25            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 26            for any tax year beginning after the effective   HB1899- 39 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 2            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 3            Department and such regulations provide methods 4            and standards by which the Department will utilize 5            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 6            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 7        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 8        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 9        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 10        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 11        foreign person who would be a member of the same 12        unitary business group but for the fact that the 13        foreign person's business activity outside the United 14        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 15        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 16        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 17        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 18        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 19        from being included in the unitary business group 20        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 21        business income under different subsections of Section 22        304. The addition modification required by this 23        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 24        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 25        group for the same taxable year and received by the 26        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary   HB1899- 40 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        business group (including amounts included in gross 2        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 3        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 4        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 5        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 6        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 7        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 8        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 9        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 10        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 11        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 12        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 13        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 14        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 15        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 16        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 17        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 18        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 19        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 20        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 21        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 22        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 23        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 24        similar types of intangible assets.25            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:26                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs   HB1899- 41 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 2            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 3            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 4            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 5            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 6            with respect to such item; or7                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 8            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 9            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 10            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 11            following:12                    (a) the person during the same taxable 13                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 14                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 15                not a related member, and16                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 17                intangible expense or cost between the 18                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 19                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 20                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 21                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 22                or23                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 24            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 25            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 26            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing   HB1899- 42 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 2            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 3            writing to the application or use of an 4            alternative method of apportionment under Section 5            304(f); 6                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 7            Director from making any other adjustment 8            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 9            for any tax year beginning after the effective 10            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 11            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 12            Department and such regulations provide methods 13            and standards by which the Department will utilize 14            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 15            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 16        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 17        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 18        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 19        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 20        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 21        business group but for the fact that the person is 22        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 23        included in the unitary business group because he or 24        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 25        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 26        addition modification required by this subparagraph   HB1899- 43 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 2        included in base income of the unitary group for the 3        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 4        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 5        (including amounts included in gross income under 6        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 8        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 9        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 10        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 11        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 12        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 13        the addition modification required under Section 14        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 15        Act; 16            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 17        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 18        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 19        to a real estate investment trust under Section 20        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 21        dividends paid;22            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 23        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 24        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 25        Act;26            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after   HB1899- 44 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 2        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 3        for the taxable year; 4            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December 5        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 6        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 7        Code for the taxable year; 8            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 9        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 10        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 11        Code for the taxable year; 12            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 13        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 14        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 15        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 16            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 17        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 18        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 19        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 20        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 21        Tax Credit Act; 22    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 23    following amounts:24            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 25        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 26        and included in such total for the taxable year;  HB1899- 45 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 2        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;3            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company, 4        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest 5        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 6        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 7        for the taxable year;8            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 9        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 10        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 11        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 12        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 13        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 14        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 15        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 16        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 17        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 18        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 19        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 20        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 21        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 22        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 23        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 24        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 25        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 26        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in   HB1899- 46 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 2        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 3        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 4        the case of a life insurance company allowed a 5        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 6        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 7        from the provisions of Section 250;8            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 10        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 11        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 12        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 13        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 14        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 15        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 16        net of bond premium amortization;17            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 18        such total which were paid by a corporation which 19        conducts business operations in a River Edge 20        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 21        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 22        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 23        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 24        the provisions of Section 250;25            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 26        such total that were paid by a corporation that   HB1899- 47 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        conducts business operations in a federally designated 2        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 3        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 4        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 5        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 6        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 7        this subparagraph (L);8            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 9        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 10        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 11        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 12        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 13        property which is eligible for the River Edge 14        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 15        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 16        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 17        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 18        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 19        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 20        investment credit property which secures the loan or 21        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 22        such property on the date that it was placed in service 23        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 24        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 25        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 26        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to   HB1899- 48 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 2        calculated under the previous sentence. This 3        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of 4        Section 250;5            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 6        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 7        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 8        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 9        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 10        property which is eligible for the High Impact 11        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 12        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 13        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 14        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 15        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 16        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 17        investment credit property which secures the loan or 18        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 19        such property on the date that it was placed in service 20        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 21        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 22        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 23        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 24        eligible for the deduction provided under this 25        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 26        available to taxpayers in any year under this   HB1899- 49 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 2        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 3        attributable to the eligible property as calculated 4        under the previous sentence;5            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 6        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 7        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 8        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 9        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 10        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 11        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 12        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 13        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 14        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250;16            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 17        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 18        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 19        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 20        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 21        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 22        income and received from a corporation that is not 23        created or organized under the laws of the United 24        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 25        including, for taxable years ending on or after 26        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed   HB1899- 50 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 2        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 3        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph 4        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is 5        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 6        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 7        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 8        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 9        included in taxable income and received, including, 10        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 11        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 12        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 13        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 14        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 15        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 16        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 17        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 18        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 19        affiliated group which includes the dividend 20        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 21        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 22        this subsection (b) which is related to such 23        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 24        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 25        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 26        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue   HB1899- 51 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 2        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 3        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This 4        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250 of this Act;6            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 7        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 8        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;9            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 10        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 11        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 12        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 13        the Internal Revenue Code;14            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 15        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 16        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 17        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 18        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 19        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 20        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 21        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 22        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 23        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 24        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 25        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 26        Section 250;  HB1899- 52 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 2        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 3        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a 4        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax 5        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 6        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 7        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 8        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 9        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 10        provisions of Section 250;11            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 12        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 13        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 14        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 15        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 16        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:17                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 18            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 19            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 20            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 21            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 22            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 23            including the bonus depreciation deduction;24                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 25            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 26            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by   HB1899- 53 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            0.429); and2                (3) for taxable years ending after December 3            31, 2005:4                    (i) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 7                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 8                by 0.429);9                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 10                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 11                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 12                1.0;13                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 14                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 15                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 16                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 17                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 18                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 19                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 20                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 21                depreciation on that property; and22                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 23                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 24                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 25                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 26                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied   HB1899- 54 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 2                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 3                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 4                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 5                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 6            The aggregate amount deducted under this 7        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 8        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 9        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 10        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 11        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 12        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 13        Section 250;14            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 15        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 16        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 17        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 18        equal to that addition modification.19            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 20        the last day of the last tax year for which a 21        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 22        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 23        required in any taxable year to make an addition 24        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 25        equal to that addition modification. 26            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction   HB1899- 55 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 2        one piece of property.3            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the 4        provisions of Section 250;5            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 6        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 7        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 8        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 9        modification with respect to such transaction under 10        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 11        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 12        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 13        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 14        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 15        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 16        that is required to make an addition modification with 17        respect to such transaction under Section 18        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 19        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 20        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 21        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 22        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 23        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 24        an addition modification with respect to such 25        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 26        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section   HB1899- 56 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 2        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt 3        from the provisions of Section 250; 4            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken 5        into account for the taxable year (net of the 6        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 7        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 8        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 9        for the fact that the foreign person's business 10        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 11        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 12        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 13        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 14        business group but for the fact that the person is 15        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 16        included in the unitary business group because he or 17        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 18        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 19        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 20        made for the same taxable year under Section 21        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 22        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 23        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 24        Section 250; 25            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 26        property taken into account for the taxable year (net   HB1899- 57 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 2        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 3        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 4        for the fact that the foreign person's business 5        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 6        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 7        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 8        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 9        business group but for the fact that the person is 10        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 11        included in the unitary business group because he or 12        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 13        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 14        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 15        made for the same taxable year under Section 16        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 17        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 18        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 20            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 21        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 22        add back any insurance premiums under Section 23        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 24        that part of a reimbursement received from the 25        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 26        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance   HB1899- 58 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        company) that would have been taken into account as a 2        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 3        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 4        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 5        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 6        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 7        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 8        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 9        Section 250; 10            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 11        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 12        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 13        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 14        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 15        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 16        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 17        provisions of Section 250; and 18            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 19        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 20        operating in this State and licensed under the 21        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 22        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 23        organization operating in this State and licensed 24        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 25        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 26        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal   HB1899- 59 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 2        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 3        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 4        of Section 250. 5        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 6    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 7    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 8    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 9    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 10    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 11    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 12    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 13    (c) Trusts and estates.14        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 15    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 16    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).17        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 18    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 19    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 20    following amounts:21            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 22        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 23        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 24        in the computation of taxable income;25            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a   HB1899- 60 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 2        required to distribute all of its income currently, 3        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such 4        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 5        the computation of taxable income;6            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 7        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 8        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 9        year;10            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 11        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 12        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 13        ending prior to December 31, 1986;14            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 15        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 16        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 17        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 18        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 19        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 20        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 21        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 22        the following limitations applied in the order that 23        they are listed:24                (i) the addition modification relating to the 25            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 26            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to   HB1899- 61 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 2            of addition modification under this subparagraph 3            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 4            which was taken into account in calculating the 5            base income of an earlier taxable year, and6                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 7            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 8            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 9            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 10            such carryback or carryforward;11            For taxable years in which there is a net 12        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 13        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 14        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 15        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 16        computed independently under the preceding provisions 17        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;18            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 19        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 20        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 21        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 22        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 23        of this Act;24            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 25        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 26        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the   HB1899- 62 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        computation of taxable income;2            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 3        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 4        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 5        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 6        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 7        201;8            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code; and13            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   HB1899- 63 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that the foreign person's business activity 11        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 26        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts   HB1899- 64 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 2        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 3        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 4        accrued, or incurred. 5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   HB1899- 65 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   HB1899- 66 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 21        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 22        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 23        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 24        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same   HB1899- 67 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 5        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 6        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 7        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 8        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 9        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 10        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 11        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 12        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 13        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 14        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 15        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 16        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB1899- 68 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   HB1899- 69 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   HB1899- 70 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 7        Act;8            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 9        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 10        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 11        Act;12            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 13        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 14        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 15        for the taxable year; 16            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 17        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 18        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 19        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 20        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 21        Tax Credit Act; 22    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 23    following amounts:24            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 25        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 26        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408   HB1899- 71 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total 2        as distributions under the provisions of any 3        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 4        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 5        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 6        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 7        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 8        adopted pursuant thereto;9            (I) The valuation limitation amount;10            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 11        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 12        and included in such total for the taxable year;13            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 14        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 15        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 16        taxation by this State either by reason of its 17        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 18        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 19        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 20        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 21        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 22        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 23        premium amortization;24            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 25        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of 26        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections   HB1899- 72 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 2        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 3        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 4        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 5        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 6        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 7        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 8        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 9        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 10        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 11        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 12        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 13        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 14        250;15            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 16        such total which were paid by a corporation which 17        conducts business operations in a River Edge 18        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 19        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 20        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 21        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 22        the provisions of Section 250;23            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 24        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 25        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;26            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in   HB1899- 73 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        such total that were paid by a corporation that 2        conducts business operations in a federally designated 3        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 4        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 5        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 6        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 7        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 8        this subparagraph (O);9            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 10        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 11        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 12        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 13        the Internal Revenue Code;14            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 15        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 16        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 17        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 18        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 19        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 20        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 21        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 22        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 23        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 24        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 25        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 26        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to,   HB1899- 74 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 2        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 3        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 4        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 5        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 6        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 7        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 8        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 9        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 10        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 11        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 12        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 13        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 14        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 15        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 16        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 17        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 18        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 19        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 22        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 23        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 24        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 25        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 26        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:  HB1899- 75 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 2            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 3            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 4            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 5            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 6            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 7            including the bonus depreciation deduction;8                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 9            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 10            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 11            0.429); and12                (3) for taxable years ending after December 13            31, 2005:14                    (i) for property on which a bonus 15                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 16                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 17                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 18                by 0.429);19                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 20                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 21                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 22                1.0;23                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 24                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 25                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 26                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the   HB1899- 76 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 2                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 3                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 4                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 5                depreciation on that property; and6                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 7                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 8                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 9                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 10                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 11                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 12                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 13                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 14                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 15                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 16            The aggregate amount deducted under this 17        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 18        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 19        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 20        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 21        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 22        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250;24            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 25        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 26        was required in any taxable year to make an addition   HB1899- 77 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 2        equal to that addition modification.3            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 4        the last day of the last tax year for which a 5        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 6        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 7        required in any taxable year to make an addition 8        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 9        equal to that addition modification. 10            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 11        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 12        one piece of property.13            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 14        provisions of Section 250;15            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 16        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 17        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 18        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 19        modification with respect to such transaction under 20        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 21        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 22        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 23        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 24        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 25        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 26        that is required to make an addition modification with   HB1899- 78 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        respect to such transaction under Section 2        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 3        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 4        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250; 6            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 7        into account for the taxable year (net of the 8        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 9        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 10        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 11        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 12        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 13        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 14        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 15        who would be a member of the same unitary business 16        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 17        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 18        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 19        required to apportion business income under different 20        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 21        addition modification required to be made for the same 22        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 23        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 25        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 26            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible   HB1899- 79 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 2        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 3        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 4        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 5        for the fact that the foreign person's business 6        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 7        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 8        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 9        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 10        business group but for the fact that the person is 11        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 12        included in the unitary business group because he or 13        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 14        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 15        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 16        made for the same taxable year under Section 17        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 18        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 19        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 21            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 22        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 23        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 24        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 25        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation 26        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt   HB1899- 80 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        from Section 250; 2            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 3        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 4        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 5        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 6        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;7            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 8        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 9        add back any insurance premiums under Section 10        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 11        that part of a reimbursement received from the 12        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 13        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 14        company) that would have been taken into account as a 15        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 16        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 17        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 18        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 19        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 20        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 21        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250;23            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 24        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 25        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a 26        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal   HB1899- 81 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        Revenue Code; and 2            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 3        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 4        operating in this State and licensed under the 5        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 6        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 7        organization operating in this State and licensed 8        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 9        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 10        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 11        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 12        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 13        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250. 15        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 16    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 17    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 18    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 19    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 20    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 21    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 22    (d) Partnerships.23        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 24    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 25    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).  HB1899- 82 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 2    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 3    of the following amounts:4            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 5        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 6        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 7        in the computation of taxable income;8            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 9        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 10        the taxable year;11            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 12        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 13        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 14        income;15            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 16        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 17        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 18        computation of taxable income;19            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 20        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 21        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 22        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 23        the Internal Revenue Code;24            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 25        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 26        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an   HB1899- 83 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 2        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 3        deductions taken in all taxable years under 4        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.5            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 6        the last day of the last tax year for which a 7        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 8        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 9        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 10        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 11        equal to that subtraction modification. 12            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 13        modification under this subparagraph only once with 14        respect to any one piece of property;15            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 16        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 17        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 18        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 19        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 20        member of the same unitary business group but for the 21        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 22        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 23        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 24        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 25        who would be a member of the same unitary business 26        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited   HB1899- 84 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 2        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 3        required to apportion business income under different 4        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 5        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 6        extent that dividends were included in base income of 7        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 8        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 9        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 10        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 11        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 12        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 13        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 14        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 15        accrued, or incurred. 16            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 17                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 18            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 19            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 20            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 21            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 22            with respect to such interest; or23                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 24            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 25            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 26            preponderance of the evidence, both of the   HB1899- 85 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            following:2                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 3                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 4                to a person that is not a related member, and5                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 6                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 7                person did not have as a principal purpose the 8                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 9                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 10                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 11                terms; or 12                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 13            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 14            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 15            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 16            and terms and the principal purpose for the 17            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 18            or 19                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 20            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 21            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 22            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 23            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 24            to the application or use of an alternative method 25            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 26                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the   HB1899- 86 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            Director from making any other adjustment 2            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 3            for any tax year beginning after the effective 4            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 5            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 6            Department and such regulations provide methods 7            and standards by which the Department will utilize 8            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 9            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 10        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 11        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 14        foreign person who would be a member of the same 15        unitary business group but for the fact that the 16        foreign person's business activity outside the United 17        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 18        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 19        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 20        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 21        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 22        from being included in the unitary business group 23        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 24        business income under different subsections of Section 25        304. The addition modification required by this 26        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that   HB1899- 87 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 2        group for the same taxable year and received by the 3        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 4        business group (including amounts included in gross 5        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 6        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 7        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 8        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 9        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 10        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 11        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 12        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 13        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 14        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 15        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 16        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 17        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 18        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 19        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 20        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 21        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 22        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 23        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 24        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 25        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 26        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and   HB1899- 88 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        similar types of intangible assets;2            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:3                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 4            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 5            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 6            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 7            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 8            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 9            with respect to such item; or10                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 11            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 12            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 13            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 14            following:15                    (a) the person during the same taxable 16                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 17                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 18                not a related member, and19                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 20                intangible expense or cost between the 21                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 22                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 23                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 24                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 25                or26                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost   HB1899- 89 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 2            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 3            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 4            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 5            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 6            writing to the application or use of an 7            alternative method of apportionment under Section 8            304(f); 9                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 10            Director from making any other adjustment 11            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 12            for any tax year beginning after the effective 13            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 14            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 15            Department and such regulations provide methods 16            and standards by which the Department will utilize 17            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 18            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 19        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 20        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 21        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 22        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 23        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 24        business group but for the fact that the person is 25        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 26        included in the unitary business group because he or   HB1899- 90 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 2        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 3        addition modification required by this subparagraph 4        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 5        included in base income of the unitary group for the 6        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 7        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 8        (including amounts included in gross income under 9        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 10        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 11        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 12        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 13        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 14        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 15        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 16        the addition modification required under Section 17        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;18            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 19        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 20        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 21        Act;22            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 23        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 24        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        for the taxable year; 26            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal   HB1899- 91 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 2        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 3        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 4        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 5        Tax Credit Act; 6    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 7    amounts:8            (E) The valuation limitation amount;9            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 10        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 11        and included in such total for the taxable year;12            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 13        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 14        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 15        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 16        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 17        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 18        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 19        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 20        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 21        net of bond premium amortization;22            (H) Any income of the partnership which 23        constitutes personal service income as defined in 24        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 25        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance 26        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered   HB1899- 92 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 2        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 5        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 6        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 7        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 8        including amounts distributable to organizations 9        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 10        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 11        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;12            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 13        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 14        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 15        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 16        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 17        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 19        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 20        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 21        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 22        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 23        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 24        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 25        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 26        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this   HB1899- 93 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 2        250;3            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 4        such total which were paid by a corporation which 5        conducts business operations in a River Edge 6        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 7        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 8        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 9        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 10        the provisions of Section 250;11            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 12        job training project established pursuant to the Real 13        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;14            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 15        such total that were paid by a corporation that 16        conducts business operations in a federally designated 17        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 18        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 19        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 20        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 21        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 22        this subparagraph (M);23            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 24        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 25        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 26        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of   HB1899- 94 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        the Internal Revenue Code;2            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 3        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 4        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 5        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 6        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 7        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:8                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 9            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 10            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 11            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 12            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 13            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 14            including the bonus depreciation deduction;15                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 16            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 17            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 18            0.429); and19                (3) for taxable years ending after December 20            31, 2005:21                    (i) for property on which a bonus 22                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 23                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 24                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 25                by 0.429);26                    (ii) for property on which a bonus   HB1899- 95 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 2                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 3                1.0;4                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 7                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 8                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 9                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 10                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 11                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 12                depreciation on that property; and13                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 14                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 15                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 16                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 17                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 18                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 19                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 20                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 21                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 22                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 23            The aggregate amount deducted under this 24        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 25        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 26        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the   HB1899- 96 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 2        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 3        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 4        Section 250;5            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 6        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 7        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 8        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 9        equal to that addition modification.10            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 11        the last day of the last tax year for which a 12        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 13        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 14        required in any taxable year to make an addition 15        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 16        equal to that addition modification. 17            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 18        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 19        one piece of property.20            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 21        provisions of Section 250;22            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 23        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 24        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 25        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 26        modification with respect to such transaction under   HB1899- 97 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 2        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 3        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 4        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 5        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 6        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 7        that is required to make an addition modification with 8        respect to such transaction under Section 9        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 10        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 11        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 12        from Section 250; 13            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 14        into account for the taxable year (net of the 15        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 16        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 17        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 18        for the fact that the foreign person's business 19        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 20        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 21        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 22        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 23        business group but for the fact that the person is 24        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 25        included in the unitary business group because he or 26        she is ordinarily required to apportion business   HB1899- 98 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 2        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 3        made for the same taxable year under Section 4        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 5        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 6        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 7            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 8        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 9        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 10        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 11        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 12        for the fact that the foreign person's business 13        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 14        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 15        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 16        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 17        business group but for the fact that the person is 18        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 19        included in the unitary business group because he or 20        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 21        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 22        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 23        made for the same taxable year under Section 24        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 25        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the 26        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from   HB1899- 99 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        Section 250; 2            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 3        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 4        add back any insurance premiums under Section 5        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 6        that part of a reimbursement received from the 7        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 8        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 9        company) that would have been taken into account as a 10        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 11        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 12        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 13        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 14        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 15        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 16        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 17        Section 250; and 18            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 19        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 20        operating in this State and licensed under the 21        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 22        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 23        organization operating in this State and licensed 24        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 25        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 26        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal   HB1899- 100 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 2        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 3        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 4        of Section 250.  5    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.6        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 7    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 8    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 9    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 10    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 11    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 12    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 13    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 14    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 15    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 16    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 17    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 18    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 19    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications 20    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 21    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 22    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 23    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 24    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 25    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation),   HB1899- 101 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 2    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 3    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 4    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 5    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 6    addition modification must be made under those 7    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 8    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 9    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 10    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 11    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 12    Internal Revenue Code.13        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 14    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 15    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:16            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 17        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 18        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 19        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 20        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus 21        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 22        Internal Revenue Code;23            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 24        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 25        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26        insurance company taxable income;  HB1899- 102 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 2        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 3        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 4        investment company taxable income;5            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 6        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 7        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 8        real estate investment trust taxable income;9            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 10        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 11        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 12        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 13        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 14        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 15        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 16        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 17        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 18        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 19        determined as if the election provided by Section 20        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in 21        effect for all such years;22            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 23        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 24        organization determined in accordance with the 25        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the   HB1899- 103 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 2        activities against income from nonpatronage 3        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 4        association may make an election to follow its federal 5        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 6        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 7        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 8        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 9        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 10        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 11        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 12        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 13        effective for all taxable years with original returns 14        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 15        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 16        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 17        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 18        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 19        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 20        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The 21        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 22        requirements for documenting the elections and any 23        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 24        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 25        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 26        existing law;   HB1899- 104 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 2        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 3        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 4        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 5        of such corporation determined in accordance with 6        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 7        that taxable income shall take into account those 8        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 9        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 10        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 11        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 12        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 13        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 14        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 15        such corporation determined in accordance with the 16        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 17        1982; and18            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 19        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 20        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable 21        income shall take into account those items which are 22        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 23        but which would be taken into account by an individual 24        in calculating his taxable income.25        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 26    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the   HB1899- 105 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 2    business has been classified as business income and in a 3    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 4    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 5    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 6    related to that asset or business that generated the 7    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 8    business income in the year of the disposition of the 9    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 10    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 11    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 12    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 13    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 14    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 15    preceding taxable years.  16    (f) Valuation limitation amount.17        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 18    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 19    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:20            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 21        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 22        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 24        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 25        plus  HB1899- 106 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 2        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 3        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 4        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 5        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 6        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 7        of such gain included in the amount determined under 8        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).9        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.10            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 11        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 12        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 13        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 14        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 15        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 16        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 17        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 18        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 19        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 20        such property.21            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 22        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 23        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 24        amount for such property is that amount which bears 25        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 26        the property for federal income tax purposes for the   HB1899- 107 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 2        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 3        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 4        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 5        period for the property.6            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 7        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 8        purposes of this paragraph. 9    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 10otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 11to be deducted more than once. 12    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 13this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 14the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 15account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 16taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 17year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 18computation of base income and net income under this Act for 19such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 20August 1, 1969 or otherwise.21(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 22102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 2312-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 24Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170,   HB1899- 108 -LRB104 03315 HLH 13337 b1Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 2eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.) 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.